Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB236.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 455 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
A bench warrant issued for a person charged with a misdemeanor or violation who has
failed to appear after proper notice shall expire after one (1) year, unless renewed by
the court upon a showing that law enforcement agencies have attempted service of the
bench warrant.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/18/2025 12:45 PM Jacketed